Utah statutes.
38-1a-602.   Notice concerning construction loan default.

(1)  Within five business days after a notice of default is filed for recording under Section 57-1-24 with respect to a trust deed on the project property securing a construction loan, the construction lender under the loan shall file a notice with the registry.

(2)  A notice under Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  include:

(i)  the information required to be included in a notice of construction loan under Subsection 38-1a-601(2); and

(ii)  the entry number of the notice of construction loan;

(b)  state that a notice of default with respect to the construction loan has been recorded; and

(c)  state the date that the notice of default was recorded.

